Washington statutes.
RCW 15.04.110

Control of predatory birds.

The director of the state department of agriculture may control birds which he or she determines to be injurious to agriculture, and for this purpose enter into written agreements with the federal and state governments, political subdivisions and agencies of such governments, political subdivisions and agencies of this state including counties, municipal corporations and associations and individuals, when such cooperation will implement the control of predatory birds injurious to agriculture.

[ 2010 c 8 s 6003; 1961 c 247 s 1.]